Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Article 5. Disposal Of Property

§ 2-1-501.
Disposal of controlled substances.

A person is authorized to collect any controlled substances of the decedent for purposes of disposal in accordance with 21 C.F.R. part 1317.30 and 21 C.F.R. part 1317.35.

History.

2016 ch. 57, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

Effective date. —

Laws 2016, ch. 57, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2016. Approved March 4, 2016.